Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.080

Denial, suspension, revocation of license—Hearings subject to administrative procedure act.

All hearings for a denial, suspension, or revocation of a license provided for in RCW 15.37.030 shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW concerning adjudicative proceedings.

[ 1989 c 175 s 50; 1961 c 285 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.